District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.83

Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The Mayor shall promulgate rules and regulations setting forth the criteria and procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 8, 2004, D.C. Law 15-185, § 14, 51 DCR 5941
Delegation of Mayor’s Rulemaking Authority for the Retail Incentive Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 and Any Similar Succeeding Legislation, see Mayor’s Order 2004-146, August 26, 2004 ( 51 DCR 9194).
Delegation of Authority-Retail Incentive Act of 2004, see Mayor’s Order 2005-195, December 13, 2005, ( 53 DCR 700).